Washington statutes.
RCW 36.125.030

Regional coordinating entities.

(1) The Puget Sound action team, or its successor organization, shall serve as the regional coordinating entity for marine resources committees created in the southern Puget Sound and the department of fish and wildlife shall serve as the regional coordinating entity for marine resources committees created for the outer coast.

(2) The regional coordinating entity shall serve as a resource to, at a minimum:

(a) Coordinate and pool grant applications and other funding requests for marine resources committees;

(b) Coordinate communications and information among marine resources committees;

(c) Assist marine resources committees to measure themselves against regional performance benchmarks;

(d) Assist marine resources committees with coordinating local projects to complement regional priorities;

(e) Assist marine resources committees to interact with and complement other marine resources committees, and other similar groups, constituted under a different authority; and

(f) Coordinate with the Northwest Straits commission on issues common to marine resources committees statewide.

[ 2007 c 344 s 4.]